Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1111
State Highway Commission; quarterly
report; contents; file with Governor; file with Clerk of the Legislature.

The State Highway Commission shall file with the Governor each quarter
a report fully and accurately showing conditions existing in the state with
reference to the state's highway building and as to construction and maintenance
work. Such reports shall further contain an itemized statement of all expenditures
and the purposes for such expenditures since the last report submitted to
the Governor. Each of such reports shall further contain an itemized budget
of all proposed expenditures for the ensuing quarter. A copy of such report
shall be filed electronically with
the Clerk of the Legislature and be made available to the public. Each member
of the Legislature shall receive an electronic copy of such
report by making a request for it to the secretary of the commission.

Laws 1953, c. 334, § 11, p. 1099;

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 11;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 39.